District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.19a

Redetermination of eligibility.

(a)

For purposes of §§ 4-205.19b, 4-205.19c, 4-205.19f and 4-205.19g, a TANF recipient shall be considered an applicant for TANF benefits at each time of redetermination of eligibility for TANF. When a current TANF recipient is considered to be an applicant pursuant to this subsection, the Mayor may require the individual to participate in a work activity other than job search or job readiness in order to comply with this section, and § 4-205.19c shall apply if the individual fails to comply with any such work activity that the Mayor may require.

(b)

As part of the redetermination of eligibility, a TANF recipient shall be provided information about the POWER program and screened for POWER eligibility. TANF applicants and recipients shall be permitted to affirmatively submit applications for POWER.

(c)

Repealed.

(d)

The Mayor, or his designee, shall inform all TANF recipients and applicants of the eligibility criteria for POWER.

(e)

Other than victims of domestic violence, pursuant to § 4-205.72a(a)(2)(A), no TANF recipients eligible for POWER pursuant to § 4-205.72a may receive case management services beyond the services currently being received on December 24, 2013, unless the Department of Human Services deems such services as necessary and funding is available.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 519a
as added Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(w), 46 DCR 905
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 5162(c), 59 DCR 8025
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 5153(d), 60 DCR 12472
Section 5151 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle N of Title V of the act may be cited as the “Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Time Limit Amendment Act of 2013”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5153(d) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5153(d) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary addition of §§ 3-205.19a through 3-205.19l 1981 Ed., see § 2(w) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(w) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682), § 2(w) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(w) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).
For temporary addition of §§ 3-205.19a and 3-205.19b 1981 Ed., see § 2(i) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-306, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1900).
For temporary addition of §§ 3-205.19a and 3-205.19b 1981 Ed., see § 2(i) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-25, February 27, 1997, 44 DCR 1778), and §§ 3-205.19a and 3-205.19b 1981 Ed., see § 2(i) of the Public Assistance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-77, May 27, 1997, 44 DCR 3181).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(w) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(i) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(i) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-7, August 1, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 4639).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 repealed (c); deleted “and TANF hardship extensions” from the end of (d); and added (e).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added the (a) designation; and added (b) to (d).
1981 Ed., § 3-205.19a.
This section is referenced in § 4-205.72.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.

Section 5152 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 19-168, § 5163.

Section 5163 of D.C. Law 19-168 provided that § 5162 shall apply upon certification by the Chief Financial Officer that sufficient revenue is available in the June 2012, September 2012, or December 2012 revenue estimates to fund section 10002(a)(1) and (2)(A) of D.C. Law 19-168.